Utah statutes.
78A-11-111.   Supreme Court action.

(1)  Before the implementation, rejection, or modification of any commission order the Supreme Court shall:

(a)  review the commission's proceedings as to both law and fact and may permit the introduction of additional evidence; and

(b)  consider the number and nature of previous orders issued by the Supreme Court and may increase the severity of the order based on a pattern or practice of misconduct or for any other reason that the Supreme Court finds just and proper.

(2)  After briefs have been submitted and any oral argument made, the Supreme Court shall issue its order implementing, rejecting, or modifying the commission's order.

(3) (a)  Upon an order for removal, the judge shall be removed from office and his salary or compensation ceases from the date of the order.

(b)  Upon an order for suspension from office, the judge may not perform any judicial functions and may not receive a salary for the period of suspension.



Enacted by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

